Idaho, session 2025, H0052.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5711, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5711. CONSTRUCTION, ALTERATION, EQUIPPING, FURNISHING AND REPAIR
OF PUBLIC BUILDINGS AND WORKS. The director of the department of administra-
tion, or his designee, of the state of Idaho, is authorized and empowered,
subject to the approval of the permanent building fund advisory council,
to provide or secure all plans and specifications for, to let all contracts
for, and to have charge of and supervision of the construction, alteration,
equipping and furnishing, repair, maintenance, other than preventive main-
tenance, of any and all buildings, and improvements of public works of
the state of Idaho, the cost of which construction, alteration, equipping
and furnishing, repair, maintenance, other than preventive maintenance,
exceeds the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000) for labor, materials and equipment, which sum
shall exclude design costs, bid advertising and related bidding expenses,
provided, that the director or his designee, and the permanent building fund
advisory council shall, in the letting of contracts under this section, com-
ply with the procedure for the calling of bids provided in section 67-5711C,
Idaho Code; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to the con-
struction, alteration, equipping or furnishing or repair or maintenance,
other than preventive maintenance, of public buildings under the jurisdic-
tion and control of the board of regents of the university of Idaho; provided
further, that the bidding procedures required by this section and section
67-5711C, Idaho Code, shall not apply to performance contracts as provided
in section 67-5711D, Idaho Code; provided further, that public works for
the Idaho transportation department, the department of fish and game, the
department of parks and recreation, the department of lands, and the depart-
ment of water resources and the water resource board, except for adminis-
trative office buildings and all associated improvements, are exempt from
the provisions of this section that relate to the administration and review
of such projects by the director of the department of administration or his
designee and by the permanent building fund advisory council. This exemp-
tion shall not relieve the Idaho transportation department, the department
of fish and game, the department of parks and recreation, the department of
lands, and the department of water resources and the water resource board


in the letting of contracts for public works, from complying with the pro-
cedures of section 67-5711C, Idaho Code, related to the advertising and
bidding for contracts. The permanent building fund advisory council may
adopt rules consistent with existing law, including rules for a program of
inspection and maintenance, to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.